Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,164
Rules and regulations.

The State Fire Marshal shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out sections 81-5,158 to 81-5,163.

Laws 1997, LB 636, § 7.